Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-550.01
Cash deposits with State Treasurer; judgment creditor; payment.

Upon receipt by the Department of Motor Vehicles of a certified copy of a final judgment secured against a depositor, such judgment having been granted for damages arising out of the accident which caused the depositing of security, as provided in sections 60-501 to 60-569, the department shall, by voucher addressed to the Director of Administrative Services, cause the payment of the deposited security to the judgment creditor in accordance with the terms of the judgment and, if it then appears there is no further liability to any persons arising out of such accident, the department shall, upon its voucher to the Director of Administrative Services, cause the balance remaining, if any, to be returned to the depositor or his personal representative.

Laws 1953, c. 220, § 1, p. 774;

Laws 1957, c. 366, § 46, p. 1279.